Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 4. Ignition Interlock Licenses

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 82, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 31-7-401.
Ignition interlock licenses; definitions; administration and enforcement.

For purposes of this article:

“Ignition interlock device” means an alcohol breath screening device connected to the engine’s ignition system, that prevents the vehicle from starting when it detects an alcohol concentration over an established limit. The device shall contain a data logger which retains records of every instance in which the device prevented the engine from starting during the period between recalibrations;

“Ignition interlock service provider” means any person who installs, services, monitors, calibrates or repairs ignition interlock devices and who must be certified by the department to perform such work.

The department shall prescribe reasonable rules and regulations for the certification of ignition interlock devices and ignition interlock service providers and for the calibration and maintenance of ignition interlock devices, which calibration and maintenance shall be the responsibility of an ignition interlock service provider. In addition to other matters necessary for the administration of this article, the rules and regulations shall:

Prohibit any ignition interlocking device from being sold or installed in this state without the device and the ignition interlock service provider being certified by the department;

Require that each ignition interlock service provider provide a reasonable service where such devices may be obtained, repaired, replaced, serviced and calibrated;

Require that every ignition interlock service provider provide monthly reports for each ignition interlocking device data logger;

Require that ignition interlock service providers check, calibrate and service each ignition interlock device installed by that provider at least every sixty (60) days and adopt a reporting requirement should the provider find evidence of tampering;

Require that each ignition interlock service provider retain all data logger records for three (3) years;

Require that each ignition interlock service provider complete certificates of installation and certificates of continuing calibration and servicing, which certificates shall be delivered to the department on a form determined by the department and within a time period set by the department;

Establish procedures under which indigent persons who are required to operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device may have one-half (1/2) the costs of obtaining and using such device paid from funds made available by the state. A person shall be considered indigent if they are able to produce evidence that they are eligible and qualified to participate in the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program.

The department shall prescribe reasonable rules and regulations and prescribe forms related to the issuance of ignition interlock restricted licenses as provided in this article.

The department shall establish a fee chargeable to every person applying for an ignition interlock restricted license. The fee shall compensate the department for all the costs directly associated with operating the ignition interlock program required by this article, but in no event shall the fee exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00). The fee shall not be collected from any indigent person who qualifies for the benefits described by paragraph (b)(vii) of this section.

All monies received by the department under subsection (d) of this section shall be deposited into an ignition interlock account. Interest earned on monies in the account shall be credited to the account. All monies in the account including earned interest are continuously appropriated to the department and shall be expended only for the purpose of operating the ignition interlock program required by this article.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 82, § 1; 2009, ch. 160, § 1; 2012, ch. 52, § 1; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, designated the existing provisions beginning with “‘Ignition interlock device’” as (a)(i); in (a)(i), deleted “located inside the vehicle near the driver's seat and” following “breath screening device” and added the second sentence; added (a)(ii); in (b), added the language provision with “and for the calibration” to the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence; and added (b)(i) through (b)(vii).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added (d) and (e).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “supplemental nutrition assistance program” for “food stamp program” in (b)(vii).

§ 31-7-402.
Issuance of ignition interlock restricted license; eligibility.

A person whose driver’s license has been suspended pursuant to W.S. 31-7-128(b)(ii) as a result of a violation related to operating a vehicle under the influence of alcohol, or whose license is otherwise suspended and is required to operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device, shall apply to the department for an ignition interlock restricted license for the suspension period or other period required by law.

A person whose driver’s license has been revoked pursuant to W.S. 31-7-127(a)(ii) as a result of a violation related to operating a vehicle under the influence of alcohol, or whose license is otherwise suspended and is required to operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device, or who is required to operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device under W.S. 31-5-233(f)(ii) shall apply to the department for an ignition interlock restricted license for the suspension or revocation period or other period required by law.

An ignition interlock restricted license issued pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall entitle the licensee to drive upon the highways of this state during the period his previously issued license is otherwise suspended or revoked or for another period required by law, subject to the following conditions:

The licensee agrees in writing to the terms and conditions of this article;

Ignition interlock devices shall be installed, at the licensee’s expense, by a certified ignition interlock service provider on all motor vehicles the licensee will drive, whether such vehicles are owned by the licensee or not, except that a licensee may operate an employer’s vehicle without an ignition interlock device installed during normal business activities and not used by the licensee for nonbusiness purposes;

and (iv) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 160, § 2.

The driver’s license and driving record of any person issued an ignition interlock license shall clearly indicate that the licensee may only operate a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device;

An applicant for an ignition interlock restricted license shall file and maintain proof of financial responsibility as required by W.S.

31-9-401

through

31-9-414

for the period of the restricted license.

No restricted license may be issued under this article until the department has received a certificate of installation from a certified ignition interlock service provider for every vehicle on which the device must be installed for that licensee under this article.

A person required to apply for an ignition interlock restricted license under subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall not be eligible to receive a driver’s license without an ignition interlock restriction until he has held the ignition interlock license for the period required by law. If a person required to apply for an ignition interlock license resides in another state, the person may meet the ignition interlock license requirement by completing the ignition interlock program in another state for the period required by Wyoming law.

The time during which a person can demonstrate installation and compliance with a department approved ignition interlock device prior to conviction for the same incident shall be credited to the person’s post-conviction ignition interlock restricted license requirements.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 82 § 1; 2009, ch. 160, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 178, § 1; 2019 ch. 49, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a) and in (b), inserted “or whose license is otherwise suspended and is required to operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device” following “blood alcohol concentration”, substituted “shall apply to the department” for “may apply to the department”, and substituted “other period required by law” for “one (1) year, whichever is greater”; in (c), inserted “or for another period required by law” following “suspended or revoked”; in (c)(ii), substituted “licensee’s expense” for “applicant’s expense”, substituted “service provided” for “installer, and substituted “motor vehicles licensee will drive” for “motor vehicles driven by the applicant”, added the provision beginning with “whether such vehicles” at the end; repealed (c)(iii) and (c)(iv), which dealt with verification of ignition interlock devices; and added (d).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), deleted “31-6-107(a)(i) or” preceding “31-7-128(b)(ii)”; deleted “or a refusal to comply with a request to submit to a test to determine the person's blood alcohol concentration” following “under the influence of alcohol” in (a) and (b); and in (b), deleted “suspended pursuant to W.S. 31-6-107(a)(ii) or” following “driver's license has been.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), deleted “and who has served at least forty-five (45) days of the suspension period” preceding “shall apply to the department” and deleted “the balance of the” preceding “suspension period or other period”; in (b), deleted “and who has served at least forty-five (45) days of the suspension or revocation period” following “with an ignition device”, inserted “or who is required to operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device under W.S. 31-5-233(f)(ii)” preceding “shall apply to the department,” and deleted “the balance of” preceding “suspension period”; and added (e) and (f).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 160, §§ 3, 4 provide: “The Wyoming department of transportation is authorized to expend from the highway fund not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00). These funds shall be expended only to pay the costs for indigent persons to obtain and use ignition interlock devices pursuant to the rules and regulations required to be adopted under this act.

“This act shall apply only to persons who become eligible to file an application for a restricted drivers' license under W.S.

31-7-402

, or are required to operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device, on or after July 1, 2009.”

§ 31-7-403.
Suspension or revocation of ignition interlock license.

Subject to the administrative hearing provisions of W.S.

31-7-105

, the department shall suspend a person’s ignition interlock restricted license when the department is notified that:

An ignition interlock device required by this article is no longer installed or functional, except as required for normal repair and maintenance;

The licensee has failed to maintain proof of financial responsibility as required by this article.

A suspension pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall remain in effect until the licensee provides written evidence that the violation causing the suspension has been cured.

Subject to the administrative hearing provisions of W.S.

31-7-105

, the department may revoke a person’s ignition interlock restricted license when the department is notified that:

The licensee has been convicted of any violation of W.S.

31-7-404

or

31-5-233

; or

The monthly reports from a licensee’s ignition interlocking device data logger indicate that the licensee is habitually attempting to operate a vehicle while impaired.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 82, § 1; 2009, ch. 160, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (c).

§ 31-7-404.
Driving without interlock device.

No person shall drive any motor vehicle without a functioning and certified ignition interlock device if:

He is licensed under this article;

He is required to apply for an interlock restricted license under W.S. 31-7-402(a) or (b); or

His driving privileges have been restricted to operating vehicles with an interlock device by a court or by operation of law.

No person shall remove or otherwise circumvent an installed ignition interlock device nor blow or solicit another to blow into an ignition interlock device for the purpose of rendering an operable vehicle to a person whose driving privileges have been restricted under this article.

A person who violates subsection (a) or (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall:

For a first offense, be imprisoned for not less than seven (7) days nor more than six (6) months, and shall not be eligible for probation or suspension of sentence or release on any other basis until serving at least seven (7) days in jail. In addition, the person shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00);

For a second or subsequent violation of subsection (a) or (b) of this section during the same license period is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months and shall not be eligible for probation, suspension of sentence or release on any other basis until serving at least thirty (30) days in jail. In addition, the person shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00);

Be considered to have been convicted under W.S.

31-5-233

for the purposes of the ignition interlock device requirements of W.S.

31-5-233

(f)(ii) through (v).

A person violating subsection (b) of this section who is not the restricted licensee is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both. Upon a subsequent violation of subsection (b) of this section, the violator shall no longer be eligible for an ignition interlock restricted license should that person ever apply and otherwise be eligible.

The courts of this state shall forward to the department a copy of the record pertaining to the disposition of any arrest or citation for a violation of subsection (a) or (b) of this section within ten (10) days after such record becomes available.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to any person starting a vehicle when necessary in the interest of safety or for the repair of the device or vehicle nor shall they apply to any ignition interlock service provider while performing his duties as an ignition interlock service provider.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 82, § 1; 2009, ch. 160, § 1; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 49, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “and certified” for “approved” in (a); in (b), deleted “licensed under this article” following “No person” and substituted the provisions beginning with “nor blow or solicit” for “during the period of the ignition interlock restricted license”; in (c), substituted “holding a restricted license under this article who violates” for “violating”, designated the existing provisions beginning with “be imprisoned for not less than seven (7) days” as (c)(i), and designated the provisions beginning with “subsequent violation” as (c)(ii); in (c)(i), added “For a first offense” at the beginning; in (c)(ii), substituted “For a second or” for “A person convicted of a”, and deleted “and shall no longer be eligible for an ignition interlock restricted license” from the end; added (c)(iii); and added (d), (e) and (f).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, at the beginning of (c)(iii) substituted “B” for “Shall.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), deleted “licensed under this article” following “No person,” added (a)(i) through (a)(iii), and made related changes; and in (c), deleted “holding a restricted license under this article” preceding “who violates.”

Cited in

Young v. State, 2016 WY 70, 375 P.3d 792,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 31-7-405.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 160, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2006, ch. 82, § 1, related to assisting another in defeating interlock device.